Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 198B Housing, Buildings, and Construction — Building Code
198B.060.
Local enforcement of Uniform State Building Code — Workers’ compensation coverage requirement — Informal hearing — Appeal.

Each local government shall employ a building official or inspector and other code enforcement personnel as necessary, or shall contract for inspection and code enforcement services in accordance with subsections (8) and (11) of this section to enforce the Uniform State Building Code within the boundaries of its jurisdiction, except that permits, inspections, and certificates of occupancy shall not be mandatory for single-family residences unless a local government passes an ordinance requiring inspections of single-family residences.

Local governments shall be responsible for the examination and approval or disapproval of plans and specifications for churches having a capacity of four hundred (400) or less persons, and six thousand (6,000) or less square feet of total floor area, and buildings of no more than three (3) stories in height, exclusive of attic and basement, which do not contain more than twenty thousand (20,000) square feet of floor area, and are not intended for educational, institutional, or high hazard occupancy; or assembly, business, or industrial occupancy in excess of one hundred (100) persons, except churches as stated in this subsection, or for use as a frozen food locker plant as defined in KRS 221.010.
(2) (a)

Local governments shall be responsible for the examination and approval or disapproval of plans and specifications for churches having a capacity of four hundred (400) or less persons, and six thousand (6,000) or less square feet of total floor area, and buildings of no more than three (3) stories in height, exclusive of attic and basement, which do not contain more than twenty thousand (20,000) square feet of floor area, and are not intended for educational, institutional, or high hazard occupancy; or assembly, business, or industrial occupancy in excess of one hundred (100) persons, except churches as stated in this subsection, or for use as a frozen food locker plant as defined in KRS 221.010.

Local governments shall be responsible for the issuance and revocation of building permits, licenses, certificates, and similar documents which cover activities within their area of responsibility, and the inspection of all buildings pursuant to this chapter and the Uniform State Building Code. Each local government issuing a building or demolition permit or an initial certificate of occupancy on a new structure shall send a copy of the permit or certificate to the commissioner for his or her use in maintaining an accurate housing inventory for Kentucky.

Urban-county governments may determine service districts within their boundaries within which farm dwellings and other farm buildings, not used in the business of retail trade or as a place of regular employment for ten (10) or more people, shall be exempt from the requirements of the Uniform State Building Code. The determination may be reviewed and altered by the department.

With the exception of single-family dwellings, the department shall be responsible for the examination and approval or disapproval of plans and specifications for all buildings which are not the responsibility of local governments. The department may issue and revoke permits, licenses, certificates, and similar documents within its area of responsibility, and shall have concurrent jurisdiction with local governments for the inspection of all buildings pursuant to this chapter and the Uniform State Building Code.
(4) (a)

With the exception of single-family dwellings, the department shall be responsible for the examination and approval or disapproval of plans and specifications for all buildings which are not the responsibility of local governments. The department may issue and revoke permits, licenses, certificates, and similar documents within its area of responsibility, and shall have concurrent jurisdiction with local governments for the inspection of all buildings pursuant to this chapter and the Uniform State Building Code.

If the commissioner determines that the local jurisdiction is not adequately performing any portion of its program, the department may preempt that portion of a local program, except that the department shall not preempt or assert jurisdiction for the enforcement of the code on single-family dwellings. The commissioner shall explain his or her reasons for preemption in writing and provide a copy to the local jurisdiction.

The local jurisdiction may appeal the preemption directly to the commissioner, and the department shall review the appeal according to the procedures found in subsections (8) to (10) of KRS 198B.070. No preemption by the commissioner shall take place until a final decision has been issued in an appeal under this subsection.

If the department preempts any portion of a local program, it shall collect the fees applicable to that portion of the program.

Any local government may petition the commissioner requesting that additional plan review functions be allocated to that local government. The petition shall include evidence of the local government’s capability to perform additional plan review functions.
(5) (a)

Any local government may petition the commissioner requesting that additional plan review functions be allocated to that local government. The petition shall include evidence of the local government’s capability to perform additional plan review functions.

The commissioner, after review of the petition and supporting evidence, may grant or deny to the local government any part of a request for additional responsibility. If the commissioner denies any part of a petition, he or she shall explain his or her reasons for denial in writing, and provide a copy to the local government.

A local government may appeal the denial directly to the commissioner, and the department shall review the appeal according to the procedures found in subsections (8) to (10) of KRS 198B.070.

If the local government is granted additional responsibility by the commissioner, the department shall hold concurrent jurisdiction over the additional responsibility, but the local government shall collect any fees for functions it performs pursuant to the additional responsibility.

Any local government may also petition the commissioner requesting that plans and specifications inspection, building inspection, and approval responsibility relating to the application of local plumbing permits for local installations be allocated to the local government. The petition shall not be granted unless the local government has demonstrated to the commissioner that it can perform these functions in accordance with KRS 198B.050 to 198B.090.

The commissioner shall expedite the review of plans and specifications by assigning responsibilities and coordinating review activities among the department’s various functional divisions so as to prevent unnecessary duplication in the review of plans and specifications.

No building shall be constructed in this state until a local building official and an official representing the department, if the department has jurisdiction, issue a permit for the construction. Nothing in this subsection shall require a single-family dwelling to be permitted or inspected unless a local government has established a building inspection program as set out in this section.

The local building official or the representative of the department shall issue a permit if the proposed building satisfies the requirements of the Uniform State Building Code and if the party desiring to construct the building has complied with all other legal requirements concerning the location and construction of the building. The applicant for a building permit, by the act of applying for the permit, shall be deemed to have consented to inspection by the local government or the department, of the building during construction and upon the completion of construction for the purpose of determining that the building is constructed in compliance with the Uniform State Building Code.

No permit for building, construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, or maintenance or for any activity related to building, construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, or maintenance shall be issued by any building department or by any political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to any person seeking the permit unless the person shall assure, by affidavit, that all contractors and subcontractors employed, or that will be employed, on activity covered by the permit shall be in compliance with Kentucky requirements for workers’ compensation insurance according to KRS Chapter 342 and unemployment insurance according to KRS Chapter 341.
(10) (a)

No permit for building, construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, or maintenance or for any activity related to building, construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, or maintenance shall be issued by any building department or by any political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to any person seeking the permit unless the person shall assure, by affidavit, that all contractors and subcontractors employed, or that will be employed, on activity covered by the permit shall be in compliance with Kentucky requirements for workers’ compensation insurance according to KRS Chapter 342 and unemployment insurance according to KRS Chapter 341.

Any person who fails to comply with the assurances required under paragraph (a) of this subsection upon such finding by a court of competent jurisdiction, shall be fined an amount not to exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) or an amount equal to the sum of all uninsured and unsatisfied claims brought under the provisions of KRS Chapter 342 and unemployment insurance claims for which no wages were reported as required by KRS Chapter 341, whichever is greater.

The penalty imposed in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be enforced by the county attorney for the county in which the violation occurred.

A certified electrical inspector shall be employed by, or contracted for, or contracted with a local government having responsibility over buildings described in this section as part of its building inspection program. After a certified electrical inspector has been provided for by the local government or the department, no utility shall initiate permanent electrical service to any new building, or any building which has been moved, until a final certificate of approval has been issued by a certified electrical inspector. Unless the department shall notify the utility in writing as to which buildings are subject to department approval, it shall be presumed by the utility that the building is subject to the jurisdiction of the local government. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit the supply or use of necessary electrical services during the construction and testing process.

This section shall apply to industrialized building systems, but destructive disassembly of industrialized building systems which carry a seal of approval pursuant to a manufactured building law in the state in which they were manufactured, which seal of approval is accepted by the department, shall not be performed in order to conduct the tests or inspections.

No building on which construction was begun nor any industrialized building system on which site preparation and assembly were begun after the Uniform State Building Code became effective shall be occupied until the local building official or a representative of the department issues a certificate of occupancy certifying that the building was constructed in conformance with the standards of the Uniform State Building Code, or assembled or installed in conformance with applicable instructions. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require a certificate of occupancy to be issued for any single-family dwelling unless a local government has established jurisdiction for the enforcement of the Uniform State Building Code under this section.

A local government may associate with other local governments, and may seek the technical assistance of other agencies or area development districts in order to provide for the local enforcement of the Uniform State Building Code.

Local governments or associations of local governments may contract with a person, firm, or company to perform the plans and specifications inspection or building inspection functions required of the local government by the provisions of this section if:

The person performing the plans and specifications inspection is certified by the department as having successfully completed the test requirements provided by KRS 198B.090 to practice as a certified plans and specifications inspector;

The person performing the building inspection is certified by the department as having successfully completed the test requirements provided in KRS 198B.090 to practice as a certified building inspector;

The person, firm, or company does not have a conflict of interest between its plan review or inspection functions and any other employment or business activities;

The person performing the plumbing inspection is certified by the department as having successfully completed the requirements provided in KRS 318.140 to practice as a certified plumbing inspector; and

The person, firm, or company does not have a conflict of interest between its plan review or inspection functions and any other employment or business activities.

If the department has reason to believe that an inspector is not enforcing, or is improperly enforcing, the provisions of the Kentucky building codes, it shall conduct an informal hearing to review the inspector’s procedures and return in written form the required corrections resulting from the hearing to the inspector, or may take action to suspend or revoke the inspector’s certificate.

If the inspector fails to comply within sixty (60) days of a written notification from the department that specifies the required corrections, the department shall suspend the inspector’s certification until the inspector complies. Any action to suspend or revoke an inspector’s certificate may be appealed to the department, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Each local government and the department may establish a schedule of fees for the functions performed under this chapter. The fees shall be designed to fully cover, but shall not exceed, the cost of the service performed. Fees payable to the department shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a trust and agency fund to be used by the department in carrying out this chapter. No part of this fund shall revert to the general fund of the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 308, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 440, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 106, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 381, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 174, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 318, §§ 82, 83, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 9, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 250, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.062.
Mandatory nature of approved construction documents — Role of on-site inspectors.

All buildings shall be constructed according to the construction documents approved by the building official having jurisdiction of the building in accordance with KRS 198B.060. No on-site inspector shall order changes in the construction of a building which are contrary to the approved construction documents. If an on-site inspector finds that any part of the construction is contrary to the approved plans, the on-site inspector may order correction, and if the on-site inspector believes that the approved documents are incomplete or in violation of the Uniform State Building Code, the on-site inspector shall refer the matter to the building official having jurisdiction for the approval of the construction documents. Any approved changes to the construction of the building shall be recorded with the construction documents before the certificate of occupancy shall be issued.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 175, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

198B.070.
Appeals.

The mayor or county judge/executive of a local government which is enforcing the Uniform State Building Code may, upon the approval of the local legislative body, appoint a local appeals board, consisting of five (5) technically qualified persons with professional experience related to the building industry, to hear appeals from the decisions of the local building official. At least three (3) members of the appeals board shall not be employed by the local government hearing the appeal.

Local governments that are enforcing the Uniform State Building Code may cooperate with each other to provide a local appeals board and shall adhere to the provisions of KRS Chapter 65 when entering these cooperative agreements. A local building official or employee of a local inspection department shall not sit on a local appeals board if the board is hearing an appeal to a decision rendered by his or her department. A member of a local appeals board shall not hear an appeal in a case in which he or she has a private interest.

Any party to a decision by the local building official may appeal that decision to the local appeals board. Upon receipt of an appeal from a qualified party, the local appeals board shall convene a hearing to consider the appeal within fifteen (15) days of receipt. All parties to the appeal shall be notified of the time and place of the hearing by letter mailed by certified mail no later than ten (10) days prior to the date of the hearing. The local appeals board shall render a decision within five (5) working days after the hearing.

A local appeals board may uphold, amend, or reverse the decision of a local building official, and there shall be no appeal from the decision of a local appeals board other than by appeal to the department. Appeals to the department shall include citation of those provisions of the Uniform State Building Code which are at issue, and an explanation of why the decision of the local appeals board or the local building official relative to those provisions is being contested.

The department shall serve to hear appeals from the decisions of local appeals boards, when these boards exist, or to hear appeals directly from the decisions of local building officials in cases where no local appeals board has jurisdiction. In no case shall the department hear an appeal directly from a party aggrieved by the decision of a local building official when there is a local appeals board with jurisdiction in the case.

The department shall hear appeals directly from a party aggrieved by the decision of an agent of the department. These appeals shall include citations of those provisions of the Uniform State Building Code which are at issue, and an explanation of why the decision of the agent of the department relative to those provisions is being contested.

Appeals to the department shall be addressed to the commissioner, who shall immediately notify the department when an appeal is received. The commissioner or a designated employee of his or her department shall then investigate the evidence pertaining to the appeal and, based upon the results of the investigation, make recommendations to the department on the disposition of the case in question. No employee of the department shall investigate or make recommendations on an appeal to his or her own decision, but shall defer in such cases to employees who were not party to the decision which led to the appeal. In conducting an investigation, the commissioner or his or her designated representatives, acting for the department, shall have the authority to administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas authorized by law, rule upon offers of proof and receive relevant evidence, take or cause depositions to be taken, regulate the course of any informal or fact-finding hearings they may schedule, and hold conferences for the settlement or simplification of the issues by consent of the parties. The commissioner shall complete his or her investigations within thirty (30) days after receiving an appeal.

If the matter is not settled by agreement of the parties through the procedure established in subsection (7) of this section, the commissioner shall schedule an administrative hearing that shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The commissioner may appoint five (5) or more members of the department to conduct the hearing, and those appointed shall act in all matters concerning the appeal for the entire department.

The department may uphold, amend, or reverse the decision of a local appeals board, a local building official, or an agent of the department by final order. An appeal of the department’s final order shall be to the Circuit Court within whose jurisdiction the property in question is located in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 36, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 308, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 23, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 318, § 84, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 251, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.080.
Amendments to the Uniform State Building Code.

Any interested party may suggest amendments to the Uniform State Building Code to the department. The department shall transmit all suggested amendments to the committee and receive comments from the committee on the advisability of the suggested amendments.

The department may amend the Uniform State Building Code at any time, but only after notice in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. Adopted amendments shall be effective statewide.

No amendment shall violate the performance orientation of the code, favor certain materials or suppliers, or weaken the life safety features of the Uniform State Building Code as specified in KRS 198B.050(3).

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 252, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.085.
Requirement for compliance of agritourism building with Kentucky Building Code — Exemptions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, an agritourism building as defined in KRS 247.801 shall comply with the Kentucky Building Code.

An agritourism building built prior to December 31, 2016, shall be exempt from the following requirements within the Kentucky Building Code:

An agritourism building built prior to December 31, 2016, shall not be required to comply with the seismic requirements within the Kentucky Building Code; and

If an agritourism building has a capacity of four hundred (400) persons or is six thousand (6,000) square feet or less, an agritourism building built prior to December 31, 2016, shall not require the services of an architect licensed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 185, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.090.
Certification of professional classifications — Training program for building code administration and enforcement.

The department shall create and administer a certification program with sufficient testing procedures to certify the following professional classifications:

Building inspector;

Plans and specifications inspector; and

Plumbing inspector.

The testing procedures shall be sufficient to reflect the ability of the person applying for certification to inspect in accordance with those local, state, and federal building codes, fire codes, plumbing codes, or health and safety codes, that are applicable to the inspection duties for which he or she requests certification.

The department shall conduct or sponsor preentry and in-service education and training programs on the technical, legal, and administrative aspects of building code administration and enforcement. For this purpose it may cooperate and contract with educational institutions, area development districts, local, regional, state or national building officials’ organizations, and any other appropriate organization.

The department shall create and administer an educational program designed to prepare building officials, code enforcement officers, and other persons interested in obtaining from the department a certification as a building inspector, plans and specifications inspector, or plumbing inspector. The program shall be designed to ensure uniform statewide enforcement of the applicable state building and plumbing codes. Training material coverage shall be adequate to prepare the participants with a working knowledge of construction design, specification terms, and the state building codes applicable to the particular field in which the applicant requests certification.

Plumbing inspectors who are in compliance with KRS 318.090 as state inspectors and KRS 318.140 as city-county inspectors, shall be considered in compliance with subsections (1)(c) and (2) of this section and shall not be required to be retested by the department prior to consideration for certification as a plumbing inspector. The department shall review the plumbing inspector’s qualifications and credentials for compliance with KRS 318.090 or 318.140 prior to issuing a certification to the inspector’s certificate applicant.

Attendance at the training sessions shall not be mandatory prior to testing for certification if the applicant’s previous education or experience qualifies the applicant to obtain a passing score on the required certification test.

Training sessions shall be held as frequently as is felt necessary by the commissioner to adequately provide for local and state building inspection needs.

The department’s plans and specifications review staff and the field inspection staff shall attend the training and become certified in accordance with this section.

All building inspectors, plans and specification inspectors, and plumbing inspectors shall be certified or enrolled and actively pursuing department certification within ninety (90) days after employment as an inspector.

The department shall establish a schedule of fees to cover the cost of the education, testing, and certification programs to be paid by the applicants for certification. The fees shall not exceed the actual cost of the services performed by the department to administer the programs listed in this section.

The department may reimburse building officials, code enforcement officers, and other employees of the state and its subdivisions for related expenses incurred by them for attendance at in-service training programs approved by the department.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 308, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 253, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.095.
Authorization for building inspectors training program — Purpose — Trust and agency fund.

The department may establish a building inspectors training program through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. The program shall provide training to encourage local governments to establish and improve building code enforcement programs and to encourage all building inspectors to upgrade their skills.

If the department chooses to establish the program authorized in subsection (1) of this section, there shall be created in the department a trust and agency fund to be known as the “Building Inspectors’ Financial Incentive Training Program fund”.

If the department establishes the Building Inspectors’ Financial Incentive Training Program fund:

The fund shall be funded annually with a maximum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) at a rate of one-half cent ($.005) per calculated square foot from the department’s plan review fees collected;

Any funds annually resulting from plan review fees in excess of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) shall be used solely for the operating costs of the department’s building inspection program;

Moneys deposited annually into the Building Inspectors’ Financial Incentive Training Program fund shall be available for use by the department to support the training program established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and

No moneys shall be deposited into the Building Inspectors’ Financial Incentive Training Program fund causing the balance to exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000).

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unused fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year. Moneys in the fund shall be available only for the purposes specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become part of the fund and shall not lapse.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 322, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 254, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.100.
Manufactured or mobile home exemption.

Unless explicitly stated, exemption of manufactured or mobile homes from the provisions of this chapter shall not exempt them from provisions of existing law regulating them for the purposes of health, safety, and welfare.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 340, § 16, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 169, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.110.
Effective dates for Uniform State Building Code — Exemptions. [Repealed]

In all local governments in a county containing a city of the first or second class, and in urban-county governments, the Uniform State Building Code shall become effective six (6) months after promulgation by the board. Any of said local governments may adopt the code prior to that time.

In all local governments in a county containing a city of the third or fourth class, but not a city of the first or second class, the Uniform State Building Code, as it pertains to buildings for which the department has the responsibility for plan reviews, shall become effective six (6) months after promulgation by the board and as it pertains to buildings for which local governments have responsibility for plan review shall become effective two (2) years after promulgation by the board. Any of said local governments may adopt the code prior to such times.

In all local governments in a county containing no city or a city of the fifth or sixth class, but not a city of the first through fourth classes, the Uniform State Building Code as it pertains to buildings for which the department has the responsibility for plan reviews shall become effective six (6) months after promulgation by the board and as it pertains to buildings for which local governments have responsibility for plan review shall become effective three (3) years after promulgation by the board. Any of said governments may adopt the code prior to such times.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 198B.060(8) and (9), a building for which a permit was legally granted prior to the effective date of the Uniform State Building Code may be constructed and occupied under the provisions of relevant regulations in force at the time the permit was issued provided that substantial construction has commenced within one (1) year from the date the permit was issued.

A building for which plans were prepared at least three (3) months prior to the effective date of the Uniform State Building Code and upon which construction was begun prior to the effective date of the Uniform State Building Code in a locality not then requiring a building permit may be completed and occupied without a building permit.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 308, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 255, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2014, ch. 92, § 314, effective January 1, 2015.

198B.120.
Injunctions to enforce building code compliance.

The department or any local government agency enforcing the Uniform State Building Code may obtain injunctive relief from any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin the offering for sale, delivery, use, occupancy or construction of any building on which construction was begun after the effective date of the code, upon an affidavit of the department or the local government agency specifying the manner in which the construction, or if a building existing prior to the effective date of the code, the reconstruction, alteration, repair or conversion does not conform to the requirements of this chapter or the Uniform State Building Code.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 256, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 12, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.130.
Private action for damages — Time limitation.

Notwithstanding any other remedies available, any person or party, in an individual capacity or on behalf of a class of persons or parties, damaged as a result of a violation of this chapter or the Uniform State Building Code, has a cause of action in any court of competent jurisdiction against the person or party who committed the violation. An award may include damages and the cost of litigation. If a certificate of occupancy was not issued, then an award may also include reasonable attorney’s fees.

Any action based upon a claim of violation of this section shall be brought within one (1) year of the date on which the damage is discovered or in the exercise of reasonable diligence could have been discovered. However, in no event shall an action be brought under this section more than ten (10) years after the date of first occupation or settlement date, whichever is sooner.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to bar any common law liability of a contractor or subcontractor or any right or cause of action against any contractor or subcontractor created by any other statute.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 445, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2020 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

198B.135.
Presumption regarding defectiveness of building design, construction, materials, or supplies where injury, death, or damage occurs more than five years after completion or incorporation.

In any action alleging defective building design, construction, materials, or supplies where the injury, death, or property damage occurs more than five (5) years after the date of completion of construction or incorporation of materials or supplies into the building, there shall be a presumption that the building was not defective in design, construction, materials, or supplies. This presumption may be overcome by a preponderance of the evidence to the contrary.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

198B.140.
Hindrance of building inspectors prohibited.

No person shall hinder an inspector enforcing any of the provisions of this chapter in the performance of his lawful duties under this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 14, effective June 17, 1978.

198B.200.
Kentucky Single Family Dwellings Advisory Committee — Membership — Duties. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 42, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 257, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 114, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.250.
Architectural Barriers Advisory Committee. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 361, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 405, § 50, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 24, § 258, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 13, effective June 29, 2017; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.260.
Administrative regulations to make buildings accessible to and usable by persons with a disability — Compliance required.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, applicable to all new and altered buildings which shall establish requirements for making all buildings accessible to and usable by persons with a disability. These regulations shall require, as a minimum, that all buildings, with the exception of one (1) and two (2) family dwellings, multifamily projects consisting of twenty-four (24) living units or less, church buildings, and historical structures whose historic significance would be threatened or destroyed, be accessible to persons with a disability. If multifamily projects are not exempt under this subsection, only one (1) out of every twenty-five (25) units shall be accessible to persons with a disability. The administrative regulations shall be incorporated into the Kentucky Building Code.

The administrative regulations promulgated by the department shall be consistent with the Federal 1991 Americans with Disabilities Act and the American Disabilities Act Guidelines.

No building permit or other official authorization for construction of any building shall be valid unless the plans and specifications are in compliance with the accessibility requirements stated in the Kentucky Building Code.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 361, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 280, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 405, § 51, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 14, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.270.
Present requirements in effect until new regulations filed.

The requirements for accessibility as established in 815 KAR 40:010 on November 13, 1974, shall remain in effect until such time as the board shall file new regulations pursuant to KRS 198B.260.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 361, § 4, effective July 15, 1980.

198B.280.
Exemption for temporary change.

Any proposed change of occupancy to a more restrictive classification, for temporary purposes only, shall not be required to comply with this chapter if prior approval for such use is obtained pursuant to KRS 227.300 and the regulations adopted thereunder.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 163, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

198B.290.
Issuance of rebuilding permits for certain types of property contiguous to river in counties with city of first class or consolidated local government and cities within such county.

In counties with cities of the first class or a consolidated local government and cities within those counties, a permit to rebuild a commercial business on property contiguous to a river, and a permit to rebuild single-family dwellings on properties contiguous to a river, shall be issued if the construction plans meet the requirements of any local floodplain ordinance.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 511, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 199, effective July 15, 2002.